Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-146
Hooker.

The county of Hooker is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range thirty-one, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence north along the west boundary line of Thomas County to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range thirty-one, west; thence west along the south line of Cherry County to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence south along the east boundary line of Grant County to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence east along the north boundary line of McPherson County to the place of beginning.

Laws 1889, c. 1, § 1, p. 69;

R.S.1913, § 859;

C.S.1922, § 761;

C.S.1929, § 25-148;

R.S.1943, § 22-146.